cs: Typ konstrukce kánoe: Skládací; Pevná skořepina; Nafukovací; Jiné
ko: 카누 구조 유형: 접이식; 하드 쉘; 공기 주입식; 기타
pl: Typ konstrukcji kanu: Składane; Sztywna skorupa; Pompowane; Inne
ja: カヌー構造タイプ: 折りたたみ式; ハードシェル; インフレータブル; その他
bg-BG: Вид конструкция на кануто: Сгъваемо; Твърд корпус; Надуваемо; Други
zh-CN: 独木舟结构类型: 折叠式; 硬壳; 充气式; 其他
nl: Type kanoconstructie: Opvouwbaar; Harde schaal; Opblaasbaar; Overig
ro-RO: Tipul de construcție al canoei: Pliabilă; Carcasă rigidă; Gonflabilă; Altele
fr: Type de construction du canoë: Pliant; Coque rigide; Gonflable; Autre
vi: Loại kết cấu thuyền Canoe: Gấp gọn; Vỏ cứng; Bơm hơi; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta izrade kanua: Sklopivi; Tvrda ljuska; Na napuhavanje; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta konstrukcije kanuja: Zložljivo; Trd trup; Napihljivo; Drugo
es: Tipo de construcción de la canoa: Plegable; Carcasa rígida; Inflable; Otro
el: Τύπος κατασκευής κανό: Πτυσσόμενο; Σκληρό περίβλημα; Φουσκωτό; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de construção da canoa: Dobrável; Estrutura rígida; Insuflável; Outro
sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie kanoe: Skladacia; Pevná škrupina; Nafukovacia; Iné
it: Tipo di costruzione della canoa: Pieghevole; Guscio rigido; Gonfiabile; Altro
de: Kanukonstruktionstyp: Faltbar; Hartschale; Aufblasbar; Sonstige
sv: Typ av kanotkonstruktion: Hopfällbar; Hårt skal; Uppblåsbar; Övrigt
fi: Kanootin rakennetyyppi: Taitettava; Kovakuorinen; Ilmatäytteinen; Muu
lt-LT: Kanojos konstrukcijos tipas: Sulankstoma; Kieto korpuso; Pripučiama; Kita
ru: Тип конструкции каноэ: Складной; Жесткий корпус; Надувной; Другое
pt-BR: Tipo de construção da canoa: Dobrável; Casco rígido; Inflável; Outro
nb: Konstruksjonstype for kano: Sammenleggbar; Hardt skall; Oppblåsbar; Annet
hu: Kenu felépítésének típusa: Összecsukható; Kemény burkolatú; Felfújható; Egyéb
da: Kanoens konstruktionstype: Foldbar; Hård skal; Oppustelig; Andet
zh-TW: 獨木舟結構類型: 摺疊式; 硬殼; 充氣式; 其他
th: ประเภทการสร้างเรือแคนู: พับได้; เปลือกแข็ง; เป่าลม; อื่นๆ
tr: Kano yapım tipi: Katlanabilir; Sert dış yüzey; Şişme; Diğer
en: Canoe construction type: Folding; Hard shell; Inflatable; Other